California statutes. Penal Code
(7) If the act is accomplished against the victim’s will by threatening to use the
 authority of a public official to incarcerate, arrest, or deport the victim or another, and the victim has a reasonable belief that the perpetrator is a public official. As used in this paragraph, “public official” means a person employed by a governmental agency who has the authority, as part of that position, to incarcerate, arrest, or deport another. The perpetrator does not actually have to be a public official.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Duress” means a direct or implied threat of force, violence, danger, or retribution sufficient to coerce a reasonable person of ordinary susceptibilities to perform an act which otherwise would not have been performed, or acquiesce in an act to which one otherwise would not have submitted. The total
 circumstances, including the age of the victim, and the victim’s relationship to the defendant, are factors to consider in appraising the existence of duress.

(2) “Incapable, because of a mental disorder or developmental or physical disability, of giving legal consent” means that a person is at the time of the intercourse either of the following:

(A) Unable to understand the nature of the act or transaction involved due to a mental disorder or developmental or physical disability.

(B) Unable to act
 freely and voluntarily due to a mental disorder or developmental or physical disability.

(3) “Menace” means any threat, declaration, or act that shows an intention to inflict an injury upon another.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 599, Sec. 1.   (SB 258)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

261.5.

(a) Unlawful sexual intercourse is an act of sexual intercourse accomplished with a person who is not the spouse of the perpetrator, if the person is a minor. For the purposes of this section, a “minor” is a person under 18 years of age and an “adult” is a person who is 18 years of age or older.

(b) A person who engages in an act of unlawful sexual intercourse with a minor who is not more than three years older or three years younger than the perpetrator, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) A person who engages in an act of unlawful sexual intercourse with a minor who is more than three years younger than the perpetrator is
 guilty of either a misdemeanor or a felony, and shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(d) A person 21 years of age or older who engages in an act of unlawful sexual intercourse with a minor who is under 16 years of age is guilty of either a misdemeanor or a felony, and shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, three, or four years.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, an adult who engages in an act of sexual intercourse with a minor in violation of this section may be liable for civil penalties in the following amounts:

(A) An adult who engages in an act of unlawful sexual intercourse with a minor less than two years younger than the adult is liable for a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand dollars
 ($2,000).

(B) An adult who engages in an act of unlawful sexual intercourse with a minor at least two years younger than the adult is liable for a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(C) An adult who engages in an act of unlawful sexual intercourse with a minor at least three years younger than the adult is liable for a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(D) An adult over 21 years of age who engages in an act of unlawful sexual intercourse with a minor under 16 years of age is liable for a civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(2) The district attorney may
 bring actions to recover civil penalties pursuant to this subdivision. From the amounts collected for each case, an amount equal to the costs of pursuing the action shall be deposited with the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered, and the remainder shall be deposited in the Underage Pregnancy Prevention Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. Amounts deposited in the Underage Pregnancy Prevention Fund may be used only for the purpose of preventing underage pregnancy upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(3) In addition to any punishment imposed under this section, the judge may assess a fine not to exceed seventy dollars ($70) against a person who violates this section with the proceeds of this fine to be used in accordance with Section 1463.23. The court shall, however, take into consideration the defendant’s
 ability to pay, and a defendant shall not be denied probation because of their inability to pay the fine permitted under this subdivision.

(f) A person convicted of violating subdivision (d) who is granted probation shall not complete their community service at a school or location where children congregate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 838, Sec. 1.   (AB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

261.6.

(a) In prosecutions under Section 261, 286, 287, or 289, or former Section 262 or 288a, in which consent is at issue, “consent” means positive cooperation in act or attitude pursuant to an exercise of free will. The person must act freely and voluntarily and have knowledge of the nature of the act or transaction involved.

 (b) A current or previous dating or marital relationship is not sufficient to constitute consent if consent is at issue in a prosecution under Section 261, 286, 287, or 289, or former Section 262 or 288a.

(c) This section shall not affect the admissibility of evidence or the burden of proof on the issue of consent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 18.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

261.7.

In prosecutions under Section 261, 286, 287, or 289, or former Section 262 or 288a, in which consent is at issue, evidence that the victim suggested, requested, or otherwise communicated to the defendant that the defendant use a condom or other birth control device, without additional evidence of consent, is not sufficient to constitute consent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 19.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

261.9.

(a) Any person convicted of seeking to procure or procuring the sexual services of a prostitute in violation of subdivision (b) of Section 647, if the prostitute is under 18 years of age, shall be ordered by the court, in addition to any other penalty or fine imposed, to pay an additional fine
 in an amount not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(b) Every fine imposed and collected pursuant to this section shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be available to fund programs and services for commercially sexually exploited minors in the counties where the underlying offenses are
 committed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 75, Sec. 3.   (AB 12)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

263.

The essential guilt of rape consists in the outrage to the person and feelings of the victim of the rape. Any sexual penetration, however slight, is sufficient to complete the crime.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 994.)
-------------------------------------------

263.1.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that all forms of nonconsensual sexual assault may be considered rape for purposes of the gravity of the offense and the support of survivors.

(b) This section is declarative of existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 848, Sec. 1.   (AB 701)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

264.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), rape, as defined in Section 261 or former Section 262, is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for three, six, or eight years.

(b) In addition to any punishment imposed under this section the judge may assess a fine not to exceed seventy dollars ($70) against a person who violates Section 261 or former Section 262 with the proceeds of this fine to be used in accordance with Section 1463.23. The court shall, however, take into consideration the defendant’s ability to pay, and no defendant shall be denied probation because of the defendant’s inability to pay the fine permitted under this subdivision.

(c) (1) A person who commits
 rape in violation of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 261 upon a child who is under 14 years of age shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for 9, 11, or 13 years.

(2) A person who commits rape in violation of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 261 upon a minor who is 14 years of age or older shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for 7, 9, or 11 years.

(3) This subdivision does not preclude prosecution under Section 269, Section 288.7, or any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 21.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

264.1.

(a) The provisions of Section 264 notwithstanding, when the defendant, voluntarily acting in concert with another person, by force or violence and against the will of the victim, committed an act described in Section 261 or 289, either personally or by aiding and abetting the other person, that fact shall be charged in the indictment or information and if found to be true by the jury, upon a jury trial, or if found to be true by the court, upon a court trial, or if admitted by the defendant, the defendant shall suffer confinement in the state prison for five, seven, or nine years.

(b) (1) If the victim of an offense described in subdivision (a) is a child who is under 14 years of age, the defendant shall be punished by imprisonment in the state
 prison for 10, 12, or 14 years.

(2) If the victim of an offense described in subdivision (a) is a minor who is 14 years of age or older, the defendant shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for 7, 9, or 11 years.

(3) This subdivision does not preclude prosecution under Section 269, Section 288.7, or any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 22.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

264.2.

(a) When there is an alleged violation or violations of subdivision (e) of Section 243, or Section 261, 261.5, 273.5, 286, 287, or 289, the law enforcement officer assigned to the case shall immediately provide the victim of the crime with the “Victims of Domestic Violence” card, as specified in subparagraph (H) of paragraph (9) of subdivision (c) of Section 13701, or with the card described in subdivision (a) of Section 680.2, whichever is more applicable.

(b) (1) The law enforcement officer, or the law enforcement officer’s agency, shall immediately notify the local rape victim counseling center, whenever a victim of an alleged violation of Section 261, 261.5, 286, 287, or 289 is transported to a hospital for a medical evidentiary or physical
 examination. The hospital may notify the local rape victim counseling center, when the victim of the alleged violation of Section 261, 261.5, 286, 287, or 289 is presented to the hospital for the medical or evidentiary physical examination, upon approval of the victim. The victim has the right to have a sexual assault counselor, as defined in Section 1035.2 of the Evidence Code, and a support person of the victim’s choosing present at any medical evidentiary or physical examination.

(2) Prior to the commencement of an initial medical evidentiary or physical examination arising out of a sexual assault, the medical provider shall give the victim the card described in subdivision (a) of Section 680.2. This requirement shall apply only if the law enforcement agency has provided the card to the medical provider in a language understood by the victim.

(3) The hospital may verify with
 the law enforcement officer, or the law enforcement officer’s agency, whether the local rape victim counseling center has been notified, upon the approval of the victim.

(4) A support person may be excluded from a medical evidentiary or physical examination if the law enforcement officer or medical provider determines that the presence of that individual would be detrimental to the purpose of the examination.

(5) After conducting the medical evidentiary or physical examination, the medical provider shall give the victim the opportunity to shower or bathe at no cost to the victim, unless a showering or bathing facility is not available.

(6) A medical provider shall, within 24 hours of obtaining sexual assault forensic evidence from the victim, notify the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the alleged
 violation if the medical provider knows the appropriate jurisdiction. If the medical provider does not know the appropriate jurisdiction, the medical provider shall notify the local law enforcement agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 23.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

265.

(a) A person who compels another person, unlawfully, against their will, and by force, menace, or duress, to marry them or to marry another
 person shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(b) This section shall be applied equally regardless of the age of the victim of a forced marriage at the time of the forced marriage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 633, Sec. 3.   (AB 1134)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

266.

A person who inveigles or entices a person under 18 years of age into a
 house of ill fame, or of assignation, or elsewhere, for the purpose of prostitution, or to have illicit carnal connection with another person, and a person who aids or assists in that inveiglement or enticement,
 and a
 person who, by any false pretenses, false representation, or other fraudulent means, procures
 a person to have illicit carnal connection with another person, is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison, or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by a fine not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 615, Sec. 1.   (AB 662)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

266a.

Each person who, within this state, takes any person against his or her will and without his or her consent, or with his or her consent procured by fraudulent inducement or misrepresentation, for the purpose of prostitution, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 647, is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison, and a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 109, Sec. 1.   (AB 2424)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

266b.

Every person who takes any other person unlawfully, and against his or her will, and by force, menace, or duress, compels him or her to live with such person in an illicit relation, against his or her consent, or to so live with any other person, is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 304.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

266c.

Every person who induces any other person to engage in sexual intercourse, sexual penetration, oral copulation, or sodomy when his or her consent is procured by false or fraudulent representation or pretense that is made with the intent to create fear, and which does induce fear, and that would cause a reasonable person in like circumstances to act contrary to the person’s free will, and does cause the victim to so act, is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year or in the state prison for two, three, or four years.

As used in this section, “fear” means the fear of physical injury or death to the person or to any relative of the person or member of the person’s family.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 287, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

266d.

Any person who receives any money or other valuable thing for or on account of placing in custody any other person for the purpose of causing the other person to cohabit with any person to whom the other person is not married, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 996.)
-------------------------------------------

266e.

Every person who purchases, or pays any money or other valuable thing for, any person for the purpose of prostitution as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 647, or for the purpose of placing such person, for immoral purposes, in any house or place against his or her will, is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for 16 months, or two or three years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 304.5.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

266f.

Every person who sells any person or receives any money or other valuable thing for or on account of his or her placing in custody, for immoral purposes, any person, whether with or without his or her consent, is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for 16 months, or two or three years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 304.7.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

266g.

Every man who, by force, intimidation, threats, persuasion, promises, or any other means, places or leaves, or procures any other person or persons to place or leave, his wife in a house of prostitution, or connives at or consents to, or permits, the placing or leaving of his wife in a house of prostitution, or allows or permits her to remain therein, is guilty of a felony and punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, three or four years; and in all prosecutions under this section a wife is a competent witness against her husband.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 305.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

266h.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), any person who, knowing another person is a prostitute, lives or derives support or maintenance in whole or in part from the earnings or proceeds of the person’s prostitution, or from money loaned or advanced to or charged against that person by any keeper or manager or inmate of a house or other place where prostitution is practiced or allowed, or who solicits or receives compensation for soliciting for the person, is guilty of pimping, a felony, and shall be punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for three, four, or six years.

(b) Any person who, knowing another person is a prostitute, lives or derives support or maintenance in
 whole or in part from the earnings or proceeds of the person’s prostitution, or from money loaned or advanced to or charged against that person by any keeper or manager or inmate of a house or other place where prostitution is practiced or allowed, or who solicits or receives compensation for soliciting for the person, when the prostitute is a minor, is guilty of pimping a minor, a felony, and shall be punishable as follows:

(1) If the person engaged in prostitution is a minor 16 years of age or older, the offense is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for three, four, or six years.

(2) If the person engaged in prostitution is under 16 years of age, the offense is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for three, six, or eight years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 709, Sec. 8.   (SB 1062)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

266i.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), any person who does any of the following is guilty of pandering, a felony, and shall be punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for three, four, or six years:

(1) Procures another person for the purpose of prostitution.

(2) By promises, threats, violence, or by any device or scheme, causes, induces, persuades, or encourages another person to become a prostitute.

(3) Procures for another person a place as an inmate in a house of prostitution or as an inmate of any place in which prostitution is encouraged or
 allowed within this state.

(4) By promises, threats, violence, or by any device or scheme, causes, induces, persuades, or encourages an inmate of a house of prostitution, or any other place in which prostitution is encouraged or allowed, to remain therein as an inmate.

(5) By fraud or artifice, or by duress of person or goods, or by abuse of any position of confidence or authority, procures another person for the purpose of prostitution, or to enter any place in which prostitution is encouraged or allowed within this state, or to come into this state or leave this state for the purpose of prostitution.

(6) Receives or gives, or agrees to receive or give, any money or thing of value for procuring, or attempting to procure, another person for the purpose of prostitution, or to come into this state or leave this state
 for the purpose of prostitution.

(b) Any person who does any of the acts described in subdivision (a) with another person who is a minor is guilty of pandering, a felony, and shall be punishable as follows:

(1) If the other person is a minor 16 years of age or older, the offense is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for three, four, or six years.

(2) If the other person is under 16 years of age, the offense is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for three, six, or eight years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 709, Sec. 9.   (SB 1062)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

266j.

Any person who intentionally gives, transports, provides, or makes available, or who offers to give, transport, provide, or make available to another person, a child under the age of 16 for the purpose of any lewd or lascivious act as defined in Section 288, or who causes, induces, or persuades a child under the age of 16 to engage in such an act with another person, is guilty of a felony and shall be imprisoned in the state prison for a term of three, six, or eight years, and by a fine not to exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1068, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

266k.

(a) Upon the conviction of any person for a violation of Section 266h or 266i, the court may, in addition to any other penalty or fine imposed, order the defendant to pay an additional fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000). In setting the amount of the fine, the court shall consider any relevant factors including, but not limited to, the seriousness and gravity of the offense and the circumstances of its commission, whether the defendant derived any economic gain as the result of the crime, and the extent to which the victim suffered losses as a result of the crime. Every fine imposed and collected under this section shall be deposited in the Victim-Witness Assistance Fund to be available for appropriation to fund child sexual exploitation and child sexual abuse victim counseling centers and prevention programs under
 Section 13837.

(b) Upon the conviction of any person for a violation of Section 266j or 267, the court may, in addition to any other penalty or fine imposed, order the defendant to pay an additional fine not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(c) Fifty percent of the fines collected pursuant to subdivision (b) and deposited in the Victim-Witness Assistance Fund pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be granted to community-based organizations that serve minor victims of human
 trafficking.

(d) If the court orders a fine to be imposed pursuant to this section, the actual administrative cost of collecting that fine, not to exceed 2 percent of the total amount paid, may be paid into the general fund of the county treasury for the use and benefit of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 714, Sec. 1.   (SB 1388)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

267.

Every person who takes away any other person under the age of 18 years from the father, mother, guardian, or other person having the legal charge of the other person, without their consent, for the purpose of prostitution, is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison, and a fine not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 258.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

269.

(a) Any person who commits any of the following acts upon a child who is under 14 years of age and seven or more years younger than the person is guilty of aggravated sexual assault of a child:

(1) Rape, in violation of paragraph (2) or (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 261.

(2) Rape or sexual penetration, in concert, in violation of Section 264.1.

(3) Sodomy, in violation of paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (c), or subdivision (d), of Section 286.

(4) Oral
 copulation, in violation of paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (c), or subdivision (d), of Section 287 or former Section 288a.

(5) Sexual penetration, in violation of subdivision (a) of Section 289.

(b) Any person who violates this section is guilty of a felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for 15 years to life.

(c) The court shall impose a consecutive sentence for each offense that results in a conviction under this section if the crimes involve separate victims or involve the same victim on separate occasions as
 defined in subdivision (d) of Section 667.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 423, Sec. 47.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Note: This section was amended November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 83.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Abandonment and Neglect of Children [270. - 273.76.]

270.

If a parent of a minor child willfully omits, without lawful excuse, to furnish necessary clothing, food, shelter or medical attendance, or other remedial care for his or her child, he or she is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment. If a court of competent jurisdiction has made a final adjudication in either a civil or a criminal action that a person is the parent of a minor child and the person has notice of such adjudication and he or she then willfully omits, without lawful excuse, to furnish necessary
 clothing, food, shelter, medical attendance or other remedial care for his or her child, this conduct is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one year or in a state prison for a determinate term of one year and one day, or by a fine not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both such fine and imprisonment. This statute shall not be construed so as to relieve such parent from the criminal liability defined herein for such omission merely because the other parent of such child is legally entitled to the custody of such child nor because the other parent of such child or any other person or organization voluntarily or involuntarily furnishes such necessary food, clothing, shelter or medical attendance or other remedial care for such child or undertakes to do so.

Proof of abandonment or desertion of a child by such parent, or the omission by such parent to furnish necessary food, clothing, shelter or medical attendance or other remedial
 care for his or her child is prima facie evidence that such abandonment or desertion or omission to furnish necessary food, clothing, shelter or medical attendance or other remedial care is willful and without lawful excuse.

The court, in determining the ability of the parent to support his or her child, shall consider all income, including social insurance benefits and gifts.

The provisions of this section are applicable whether the parents of such child are or were ever married or divorced, and regardless of any decree made in any divorce action relative to alimony or to the support of the child. A child conceived but not yet born is to be deemed an existing person insofar as this section is concerned.

The husband of a woman who bears a child as a result of artificial insemination shall be considered the father of that child for the purpose of this section, if he consented in
 writing to the artificial insemination.

If a parent provides a minor with treatment by spiritual means through prayer alone in accordance with the tenets and practices of a recognized church or religious denomination, by a duly accredited practitioner thereof, such treatment shall constitute “other remedial care”, as used in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1432, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

270.5.

(a) Every parent who refuses, without lawful excuse, to accept his or her minor child into the parent’s home, or, failing to do so, to provide alternative shelter, upon being requested to do so by a child protective agency and after being informed of the duty imposed by this statute to do so, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(b) For purposes of this section, “child protective agency” means a police or sheriff’s department, a county probation department, or a county welfare department.

(c) For purposes of this section, “lawful excuse” shall include, but not be limited to, a reasonable fear that the minor child’s presence in the home will endanger the safety of the parent or other persons residing in the home.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1616, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

270.6.

If a court of competent jurisdiction has made a temporary or permanent order awarding spousal support that a person must pay, the person has notice of that order, and he or she then leaves the state with the intent to willfully omit, without lawful excuse, to furnish the spousal support, he or she is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for a period not exceeding one year, a fine not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000), or both that imprisonment and fine.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 410, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

270a.

Every individual who has sufficient ability to provide for his or her spouse’s support, or who is able to earn the means of such spouse’s support, who willfully abandons and leaves his or her spouse in a destitute condition, or who refuses or neglects to provide such spouse with necessary food, clothing, shelter, or medical attendance, unless by such spouse’s conduct the individual was justified in abandoning such spouse, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1170.)
-------------------------------------------

270b.

After arrest and before plea or trial, or after conviction or plea of guilty and before sentence under either Section 270 or 270a, if the defendant shall appear before the court and enter into an undertaking with sufficient sureties to the people of the State of California in such penal sum as the court may fix, to be approved by the court, and conditioned that the defendant will pay to the person having custody of such child or to such spouse, such sum per month as may be fixed by the court in order to thereby provide such minor child or such spouse as the case may be, with necessary food, shelter, clothing, medical attendance, or other remedial care, then the court may
 suspend proceedings or sentence therein; and such undertaking is valid and binding for two years, or such lesser time which the court shall fix; and upon the failure of defendant to comply with such undertaking, the defendant may be ordered to appear before the court and show cause why further proceedings should not be had in such action or why sentence should not be imposed, whereupon the court may proceed with such action, or pass sentence, or for good cause shown may modify the order and take a new undertaking and further suspend proceedings or sentence for a like period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1170.)
-------------------------------------------

270c.

Except as provided in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 4410) of Part 4 of Division 9 of the Family Code, every adult child who, having the ability so to do, fails to provide necessary food, clothing, shelter, or medical attendance for an indigent parent, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 163, Sec. 102.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 161 of Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------

270d.

In any case where there is a conviction and sentence under the provisions of either Section 270 or Section 270a, should a fine be imposed, such fine shall be directed by the court to be paid in whole or in part to the spouse of the defendant or guardian or custodian of the child or children of such defendant, except as follows:

If the children are receiving public assistance, all fines, penalties or forfeitures imposed and all funds collected from the defendant shall be paid to the county department. Money so paid shall be applied first to support for the calendar month following its receipt by the county department and any balance
 remaining shall be applied to future needs, or be treated as reimbursement for past support furnished from public assistance funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 893.)
-------------------------------------------

270e.

No other evidence shall be required to prove marriage or registered domestic partnership of spouses, or that a person is the lawful father or mother of a child or children, than is or shall be required to prove such facts in a civil action. In all prosecutions under either Section 270a or 270 of this code, Sections 970, 971, and 980 of the Evidence Code do not apply, and both spouses or domestic partners shall be competent to testify to any and all relevant matters, including the fact of marriage or registered domestic partnership and the parentage of a child or children. Proof of the abandonment and nonsupport of a spouse, or of the omission to furnish necessary food, clothing, shelter, or of medical attendance for a child or children is prima facie evidence that such
 abandonment and nonsupport or omission to furnish necessary food, clothing, shelter, or medical attendance is willful. In any prosecution under Section 270, it shall be competent for the people to prove nonaccess of husband to wife or any other fact establishing nonpaternity of a husband. In any prosecution pursuant to Section 270, the final establishment of paternity or nonpaternity in another proceeding shall be admissible as evidence of paternity or nonpaternity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 68.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

270f.

Where, under the provisions of this chapter, a report is filed by a parent of a child with the district attorney averring:

(1) That the other parent has failed to provide necessary support and

(2) That neither the child in need of assistance nor another on his behalf is receiving public assistance, the district attorney shall immediately investigate the verity of such report and determine the defaulting parent’s location and financial ability to provide the needed support, and upon a finding that the report is true shall immediately take all steps
 necessary to obtain support for the child in need of assistance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 893.)
-------------------------------------------

270g.

A review of each report filed with the district attorney under Section 270f shall be made at 90-day intervals unless the support payments have been legally terminated, the parties involved are permanently located beyond county jurisdiction, or the defaulting parent is complying with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 893.)
-------------------------------------------

270h.

In any case where there is a conviction under either Section 270 or 270a and there is an order granting probation which includes an order for support, the court may:

(a) Issue an execution on the order for the support payments that accrue during the time the probation order is in effect, in the same manner as on a judgment in a civil action for support payments. This remedy shall apply only when there is no existing civil order of this state or a foreign court order that
 has been reduced to a judgment of this state for support of the same person or persons included in the probation support order. 

(b) Issue an earnings assignment order for support pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 5200) of Part 5 of Division 9 of the Family Code as a condition of probation. This remedy shall apply only when there is no existing civil order for support of the same person or persons included in the probation support order upon which an assignment order has been entered pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 5200) of Part 5 of Division 9 of the Family Code or pursuant to former Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 4390) of Title 1.5 of Part 5 of Division 4 of the Civil Code.

These remedies are in addition to any other remedies available to the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 163, Sec. 103.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 161 of Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------

271.

Every parent of any child under the age of 14 years, and every person to whom any such child has been confided for nurture, or education, who deserts such child in any place whatever with intent to abandon it, is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 or in the county jail not exceeding one year or by fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by
 both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 306.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

271a.

Every person who knowingly and willfully abandons, or who, having ability so to do, fails or refuses to maintain his or her minor child under the age of 14 years, or who falsely, knowing the same to be false, represents to any manager, officer or agent of any orphan asylum or charitable institution for the care of orphans, that any child for whose admission into that asylum or institution application
 has been made is an orphan, is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or in the county jail not exceeding one year, or by fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both.
